Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF93.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256L.04, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 15. new text end new text begin Direct support services workforce. new text end new text begin (a) Individuals and families with household income equal to or less than 400 percent of the federal poverty guidelines for the applicable family size who otherwise are ineligible for MinnesotaCare under subdivision 7a are eligible for MinnesotaCare without federal participation if an individual in the household provides direct support services. "Direct support services" means in-home, nonprofessional, long-term services and supports provided to an older adult or person with a disability and funded in whole or in part by medical assistance, including by the home and community-based waivers, alternative care, the essential community supports program, or community support grants. new text end new text begin (b) The individual who provides direct support services must work 20 hours per week providing direct support services for the individual's household to qualify for MinnesotaCare under this subdivision. Once a household is eligible for MinnesotaCare under this subdivision, the individual providing direct support services may work fewer than 20 hours per week providing direct support services for a maximum of four weeks within a single redetermination period without the household losing eligibility. new text end new text begin (c) The individual providing direct support services must submit proof of employment providing direct support services to the commissioner of human services to establish eligibility for MinnesotaCare under this subdivision. For individuals eligible under this subdivision, MinnesotaCare coverage must begin one month after submission of proof of employment. A redetermination of eligibility must occur every six months. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256L.15, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Sliding fee scale; monthly individual or family income. (a) The commissioner shall establish a sliding fee scale to determine the percentage of monthly individual or family income that households at different income levels must pay to obtain coverage through the MinnesotaCare program. The sliding fee scale must be based on the enrollee's monthly individual or family income. (b) Beginning January 1, 2014, MinnesotaCare enrollees shall pay premiums according to the premium scale specified in paragraph (d). (c) Paragraph (b) does not apply to: (1) children 20 years of age or younger; and (2) individuals with household incomes below 35 percent of the federal poverty guidelines. (d) The following premium scale is established for each individual in the household who is 21 years of age or older and enrolled in MinnesotaCare: Federal Poverty Guideline Greater than or Equal to Less than Individual Premium Amount 35% 55% $4 55% 80% $6 80% 90% $8 90% 100% $10 100% 110% $12 110% 120% $14 120% 130% $15 130% 140% $16 140% 150% $25 150% 160% $37 160% 170% $44 170% 180% $52 180% 190% $61 190% 200% $71 200% $80 (e) Beginning January 1, 2021, the commissioner shall adjust the premium scale established under paragraph (d) to ensure that premiums do not exceed the amount that an individual would have been required to pay if the individual was enrolled in an applicable benchmark plan in accordance with the Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 600.505 (a)(1). new text begin (f) Individuals eligible for MinnesotaCare under section 256L.04, subdivision 15, shall pay an individual premium of $80 per month. Children 20 years of age or younger are exempt from premiums under this paragraph. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the health care access fund to the commissioner of human services to provide state-only funded MinnesotaCare coverage to individuals eligible under Minnesota Statutes, section 256L.04, subdivision 15. new text end